Maine, session 132, LD1358.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §3204, sub-§11, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 287, §1, is amended
to read:
11. Affiliated generation outside service territory permitted. Notwithstanding
subsection 5, an affiliate of an investor-owned transmission and distribution utility may
own generation or generation-related assets in accordance with standards of conduct
adopted under this subsection as long as the generation or generation-related assets are not
directly interconnected to the facilities owned or operated by that investor-owned
transmission and distribution utility. The commission shall establish, by rule, standards of
conduct governing the relationships permitted under this section between an investor-
owned transmission and distribution utility and an affiliate of the investor-owned
transmission and distribution utility that owns generation or generation-related assets that:
A. Prohibit a transmission and distribution utility from taking any action that favors
such an affiliate or adversely affects a competitor of such an affiliate in a manner that
is unjust or unreasonable;
B. Ensure the separation and independence of such affiliates; and
C. Protect ratepayers.
For purposes of this subsection, "affiliate" means a person who has any direct or indirect
ownership interest in, or is a direct or indirect subsidiary of a person who has any ownership
interest in, the investor-owned transmission and distribution utility, but does not include a
wholly owned or partially owned direct or indirect subsidiary of the investor-owned
transmission and distribution utility.
Any affiliate generation or generation-related assets permitted under this subsection that
do not have a commission-approved long-term contract or term sheet under this Title as of
July 1, 2017 are ineligible to participate in a long-term contract under this Title.
Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are major substantive rules as defined in Title 5,
chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.